Hawaii statutes.
[§304A-3203] Execution. The governor
shall execute the compact on behalf of this State and perform any other acts
that may be deemed requisite to its formal ratification and promulgation. [L
2006, c 75, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next